Massachusetts, session 194th, H2686.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 116I the
following section:-
Section 116I ½. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Agency”, the ability to make independent decisions and act in one’s own best interests.
“Autism spectrum”, a disorder or disability on the autism spectrum, including but not
limited to: autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, pervasive developmental disorder - not
otherwise specified, childhood disintegrative disorder, nonverbal learning disorder or Rhett's
of 4

Syndrome, as defined in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of the
American Psychiatric Association.
“Correction officer”, any officer employed by a correctional facility who is tasked with
the custody, care or transport of incarcerated or detained persons.
“Correctional facility”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 125.
“Intellectual and developmental disabilities”, an intellectual or developmental disability,
as defined in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of the American
Psychiatric Association.
“Law enforcement agency”, (i) a state, county, municipal or district law enforcement
agency, including, but not limited to: a city, town or district police department, the office of
environmental law enforcement, the University of Massachusetts police department, the
department of the state police, the Massachusetts Port Authority police department, also known
as the Port of Boston Authority police department, and the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority police department; (ii) a sheriff’s department in its performance of police duties and
functions; or (iii) a public or private college, university or other educational institution or
hospital police department.
“Law enforcement officer” or “officer”, any officer of an agency, including the head of
the agency; a special state police officer appointed pursuant to section 58 or section 63 of chapter
22C; a special sheriff appointed pursuant to section 4 of chapter 37 performing police duties and
functions; a deputy sheriff appointed pursuant to section 3 of said chapter 37 performing police
duties and functions; a constable executing an arrest for any reason; or any other special, reserve
or intermittent police officer.
of 4

(b) The municipal police training committee shall establish an in-service training
curriculum on or before January 1, 2024 for the training of law enforcement officers and
correction officers in appropriate interactions with persons on the autism spectrum and persons
with other intellectual and developmental disabilities; provided, that this training shall not
increase the currently required hours of in-service training. The municipal police training
committee shall develop guidelines for law enforcement response to persons on the autism
spectrum and persons with other intellectual and developmental disabilities who are victims or
witnesses to a crime, or suspected or convicted of a crime. The course of instruction and the
guidelines shall emphasize: (1) positive responses to persons on the autism spectrum and persons
with other intellectual and developmental disabilities, (2) de-escalating potentially dangerous
situations, (3) understanding of the different manner by which persons on the autism spectrum
and persons with other intellectual and developmental disabilities process sensory stimuli and
language and (4) appropriate methods of interrogation. The training shall address the best
practices for interactions with the broad range of persons on the autism spectrum and persons
with other intellectual and developmental disabilities, including those with intersecting
marginalized identities.
The training presenters shall include presentations from adults on the autism spectrum.
Where appropriate, the training presenters shall also include experts on autism spectrum
disorders who also have expertise in the law enforcement or correction field.
(c) The in-service training for law enforcement officers and correction officers shall
include not less than 2 hours of instruction in the procedures and techniques described below:
of 4

(1) The nature and manifestations of autism spectrum disorders and other intellectual and
developmental disabilities.
(2) Appropriate techniques for interviewing or interrogating persons on the autism
spectrum and persons with other intellectual and developmental disabilities, including techniques
to ensure legality of statements made, and techniques to protect the rights of the interviewee.
(3) Techniques for locating persons on the autism spectrum and persons with other
intellectual and developmental disabilities who runs away and are in danger, and returning the
person while causing as little stress as possible to the person.
(4) The legal duties imposed on police officers to offer protection and assistance,
including guidelines for making felony and misdemeanor arrests, and appropriate techniques for
arrest and restraint of persons on the autism spectrum and persons with other intellectual and
developmental disabilities.
(5) Techniques for de-escalating a potentially dangerous situation to maximize the safety
of both: (i) law enforcement officers or correction officers and (ii) persons on the autism
spectrum and persons with other intellectual and developmental disabilities.
(6) Techniques for differentiating between persons on the autism spectrum and persons
with other intellectual and developmental disabilities from a person who is belligerent,
uncooperative or otherwise displaying traits similar to the characteristics of a person on the
autism spectrum and persons with other intellectual and developmental disabilities.
(7) Procedures to ensure the safety and wellbeing of persons on the autism spectrum and
persons with other intellectual and developmental disabilities in a correctional facility.
of 4